Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2008
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; costs of action.

The accuser and the accused are liable to costs as in other actions.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 8, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5705;

C.S.1922, § 5035;

C.S.1929, § 26-1708;

R.S.1943, § 23-2008.